Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1302.01
Approved unique identifier, defined.

Approved unique identifier means a number, combination of numbers and letters, or other identifier selected by the Secretary of State using a selection system or method approved by the Secretary of the United States Department of Agriculture.

Laws 2007, LB124, § 60.